Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.190

ESD board—Teachers' institutes, directors' meetings—Cooperation with state supervisor—Certification of data.

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every educational service district board shall:

(1) If the district board deems necessary, hold each year one or more teachers' institutes as provided for in RCW 28A.415.010 and one or more school directors' meetings.

(2) Cooperate with the state supervisor of special aid for children with disabilities as provided in RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100.

(3) Certify statistical data as basis for apportionment purposes to county and state officials as provided in chapter 28A.545 RCW.

(4) Perform such other duties as may be prescribed by law or rule of the state board of education and/or the superintendent of public instruction as provided in RCW 28A.300.030 and * 28A.305.210.

[ 1995 c 77 s 20; 1990 c 33 s 277; 1983 c 56 s 2; 1981 c 103 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 12. Formerly RCW 28A.21.088.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.305.210 expired July 1, 2007.

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.